Georgia, session 2025_26, HB163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 13 of Chapter 2 of Title 26 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
food service establishments, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"26-2-378.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Cell cultured meat' means any food product that is:
(A) Artificially grown from cell cultures of animal muscle or organ tissues; and
(B) Designed to share sensory characteristics with conventional meat products.
(2) 'Conventional meat product' means any food product that:
(A) Is made wholly or in part from the carcass of any animal, including, but not limited
to, cattle, swine, sheep, goats, fish, shellfish, and poultry; and
H. B. 163
- 1 -

LC 57 0176
(B) Does not contain cell cultured meat or plant based meat alternatives.
(3) 'Plant based meat alternative' means any food product that is:
(A) Produced or derived from one or more plants, or parts of plants; and
(B) Designed to share sensory characteristics with conventional meat products.
(4) 'Poultry' shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 26-2-410.
(b) All food service establishments in the state that serve food products containing cell
cultured meat, plant based meat alternatives, or both shall conspicuously display on their
menus, or on placards visible to the public, disclosures stating that such food products
contain cell cultured meat, plant based meat alternatives, or both.
(c) No food product containing cell cultured meat, plant based meat alternatives, or both
shall be labeled, advertised, or otherwise represented by any food service establishment as
constituting conventional meat products."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 163
- 2 -